Hawaii, session 2025, SB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the third senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Kona Community Hospital A.   Improvements to emergency intake and treatment to bring the emergency department into post‑pandemic era standards to ensure continued compliance. Total funding                              $13,239,000 2.   Holualoa Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for replacement of F/S lines; equipment and appurtenances. Design                          $20,000 Construction                   $200,000 Total funding                                 $220,000 C.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment for internal campus road improvements; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                           $75,000 Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $300,000 Equipment                       $25,000 Total funding                                 $425,000 D.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for the initial phase of master plan construction. Plans                          $100,000 Design                         $100,000 Construction                $48,000,000 Equipment                    $2,000,000 Total funding                              $50,200,000 E.   Construction for fence enclosure of campus; equipment and appurtenances. Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                               $1,000,000 3.   Honaunau Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for replacement of gutters and downspouts; equipment and appurtenances. Design                           $1,400 Construction                    $14,000 Total funding                                  $15,400 C.   Plans and construction for restroom facility in portable 9; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $200,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,200,000 D.   Plans and construction for the replacement of sliding doors with a wall and second door in building B; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $100,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                               $1,100,000 E.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment for a ramp to upper field compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act. Plans                          $500,000 Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $1,250,000 Equipment                      $250,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 4.   Hookena Elementary School A.   Design and construction for drainage and campus improvements; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $200,000 Construction                 $4,333,000 Total funding                               $4,533,000 B.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 C.   Design and construction for reroofing of covered walkway that is compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act; equipment and appurtenances. Design                          $14,375 Construction                   $143,750 Total funding                                 $158,125 D.   Design and construction for temporary shoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                           $1,500 Construction                    $15,000 Total funding                                  $16,500 5.   Kahakai Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a bridge connecting buildings A and B that is compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act; ground and site improvements. Plans                          $500,000 Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $1,250,000                   Equipment                      $250,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 C.   Plans, design, and construction for air conditioning installation in the office building and cafeteria; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $6,000,000 6.   Kau High and Pahala Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for G structural; equipment and appurtenances. Design                      $ Construction                $ Total funding                              $ C.   Design and construction for replacement of gutters at Pahala Elementary School; equipment and appurtenances. Design                           $8,000 Construction                    $80,000 Total funding                                  $88,000 D.   Plans and construction for trenching and cabling campus-wide for high-speed internet; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                           $50,000 Construction                   $300,000 Total funding                                 $350,000 E.   Design and construction for five portable classrooms to provide dedicated middle school learning spaces for grades seven and eight; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $200,000 Construction                 $6,800,000 Total funding                               $7,000,000 7.   Ke Kula o Ehunuikaimalino A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Construction for hale P abatement and renovations; equipment and appurtenances. Construction                   $120,000 Total funding                                 $120,000 8.   Kealakehe Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for completion of air conditioning system installation for the cafeteria dining room; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $4,500,000 9.   Kealakehe High School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction of elevator repairs and upgrades to ensure safety and compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,500,000 Total funding                               $3,000,000 C.   Plans and construction for stadium light upgrade from HID lighting to LED lighting; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $500,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                               $4,500,000 D.   Plans and construction for repainting campus buildings to maintain structural integrity; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $3,000,000 Total funding                               $3,500,000 10.  Kealakehe Intermediate School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances to upgrade and rebuild the cafeteria stage theater to include stage lights, reconstruct stage area, and outfit dressing room area. Plans                           $20,000 Design                          $20,000 Construction                   $300,000 Equipment                      $300,000 Total funding                                 $640,000 C.   Plans, design, and construction for redesign and rebuild of the cafeteria bathrooms to add new plumbing, flooring, doors, mirrors, and sinks; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                           $20,000 Design                          $50,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                               $1,070,000 D.   Design and construction for completion of air conditioning system in classroom buildings F, G, and H; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $200,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                               $1,200,000 E.   Plans, land, design, and construction for repairing and renovating locker room showers and necessary upgrades to the hot water system; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $100,000 Land                           $100,000 Design                       $2,000,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                               $3,200,000 11.  Konawaena Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Equipment                      $700,000 Total funding                               $3,200,000 12.  Konawaena High School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction to repair and replace gymnasium roof; ground and site improvements; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $218,000 Construction                 $1,192,000 Total funding                               $1,410,000 C.   Design and construction to repair and replace chill box floor; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $170,000 Construction                 $1,700,000 Total funding                               $1,870,000 13.  Konawaena Middle School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for F‑level building; equipment and appurtenances. Design                          $32,000 Construction                   $320,000 Total funding                                 $352,000 C.   Design and construction for F‑level structural repairs; equipment and appurtenances. Design                          $65,000 Construction                   $650,000 Total funding                                 $715,000 D.   Construction of draining repair and shoring of building F; equipment and appurtenances. Construction                 $3,000,000 Total funding                               $3,000,000 14.  Naalehu Elementary School A.   Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,500,000 B.   Design and construction for replacement of building A; equipment and appurtenances. Design                          $47,350 Construction                    473,500 Total funding                                 $520,850 C.   Plans, construction, and appurtenances for new buildings or gutters to improve campus safety. Plans                          $100,000 Construction                   $327,000 Total funding                                 $427,000 D.   Construction and equipment to paint and repaint campus structures; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $100,000 Construction                   $397,000 Total funding                                 $497,000 E.   Construction for various repairs and maintenance to the campus; equipment and appurtenances. Construction                   $594,000 Total funding                                 $594,000 15.  Honokohau Small Boat Harbor A.   Asphalt paving, striping, and drainage improvements in the existing gravel parking areas of the north and south sides of the harbor; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $4,500,000 B.   Replacement of existing fixed concrete piers with new pile guided aluminum floating docks, including water and electrical service; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $8,500,000 C.   Replacement of existing fendering along harbor marginal wharf with new plastic lumber fendering; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $5,500,000 16.  Kailua-Kona Wharf A.   Replacement of existing wooden loading platforms along the north side of the wharf; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $4,500,000 17.  Kaulana Bay Boat Ramp A.   Plans, design, and construction of a new breakwater, boat ramp, loading dock, trailer turnaround, and parking area; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $20,000,000 Total funding                              $22,000,000 18.  Keauhou Small Boat Harbor A.   Repair of existing boat ramp and loading docks; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $4,500,000 19.  Milolii Landing A.   Design and construction for the repair and replacement of the fish hoist; equipment and appurtenances. Design                         $200,000 Construction                   $800,000 Total funding                               $1,000,000 B.   Repair of existing concrete wharf. Total funding                               $3,000,000 C.   Resurfacing and restriping of existing access road and new asphalt paving in existing gravel parking area. Total funding                               $1,500,000 20.  Department of Transportation A.   Plans, design, and construction to widen Queen Kaahumanu highway and Kuakini highway between Henry street and Kamehameha III road on the island of Hawaii; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction               $100,000,000 Total funding                             $102,000,000 21.  County of Hawaii Department of Parks and Recreation A.   Plans and construction for general improvements to old Kona airport state recreation area; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $200,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                               $2,200,000 SECTION 2. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. The sum appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sum appropriated in item 1 shall be expended by the Hawaii health systems corporation; (2)  The sum appropriated in items 2 through 14 shall be expended by the department of education; (3)  The sum appropriated in items 15 through 19 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources; (4)  The sum appropriated in item 20 shall be expended by the department of transportation; and (5)  The sum appropriated in item 21 shall be expended by the county of Hawaii; provided that the county of Hawaii provides matching funds on a dollar-to-dollar basis. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________